UK Public General Acts > 2022 c. 32 

PART 3

Public nuisance
78 Intentionally or recklessly causing public nuisance
(1)A person commits an offence if—

(a)the person—

(i)does an act, or

(ii)omits to do an act that they are required to do by any enactment or rule of law,

(b)the person’s act or omission—

(i)creates a risk of, or causes, serious harm to the public or a section of the public, or

(ii)obstructs the public or a section of the public in the exercise or enjoyment of a right that may be exercised or enjoyed by the public at large, and

(c)the person intends that their act or omission will have a consequence mentioned in paragraph (b) or is reckless as to whether it will have such a consequence.

(2)In subsection (1)(b)(i) “serious harm” means—

(a)death, personal injury or disease,

(b)loss of, or damage to, property, or

(c)serious distress, serious annoyance, serious inconvenience or serious loss of amenity.

(3)It is a defence for a person charged with an offence under subsection (1) to prove that they had a reasonable excuse for the act or omission mentioned in paragraph (a) of that subsection.

(4)A person guilty of an offence under subsection (1) is liable—

(a)on summary conviction, to imprisonment for a term not exceeding [F1the general limit in a magistrates’ court], to a fine or to both;

(b)on conviction on indictment, to imprisonment for a term not exceeding 10 years, to a fine or to both.

(5)In relation to an offence committed before the coming into force of paragraph 24(2) of Schedule 22 to the Sentencing Act 2020 (increase in magistrates’ court power to impose imprisonment) the reference in subsection (4)(a) to [F2the general limit in a magistrates’ court] is to be read as a reference to 6 months.

(6)The common law offence of public nuisance is abolished.

(7)Subsections (1) to (6) do not apply in relation to—

(a)any act or omission which occurred before the coming into force of those subsections, or

(b)any act or omission which began before the coming into force of those subsections and continues after their coming into force.

(8)This section does not affect—

(a)the liability of any person for an offence other than the common law offence of public nuisance,

(b)the civil liability of any person for the tort of public nuisance, or

(c)the ability to take any action under any enactment against a person for any act or omission within subsection (1).

(9)In this section “enactment” includes an enactment comprised in subordinate legislation within the meaning of the Interpretation Act 1978.

Textual Amendments

F1	Words in s. 78(4)(a) substituted (7.2.2023 at 12.00 p.m.) by The Judicial Review and Courts Act 2022 (Magistrates’ Court Sentencing Powers) Regulations 2023 (S.I. 2023/149), regs. 1(2), 2(1), Sch. Pt. 1

F2	Words in s. 78(5) substituted (7.2.2023 at 12.00 p.m.) by The Judicial Review and Courts Act 2022 (Magistrates’ Court Sentencing Powers) Regulations 2023 (S.I. 2023/149), regs. 1(2), 2(1), Sch. Pt. 1

Commencement Information

I13	S. 78 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I14	S. 78 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

[...]

Prospective

Repeal of the Vagrancy Act 1824 etc
81 Repeal of the Vagrancy Act 1824 etc
(1)The Vagrancy Act 1824 is repealed.

(2)Subsections (3) to (7) contain amendments and repeals in consequence of subsection (1).

(3)The following are repealed—

(a)the Vagrancy Act 1935;

(b)section 2(3)(c) of the House to House Collections Act 1939 (licences);

(c)section 20 of the Criminal Justice Act 1967 (power of magistrates’ court to commit on bail for sentence);

(d)in the Criminal Justice Act 1982—

(i)section 70 and the italic heading immediately before that section (vagrancy offences), and

(ii)paragraph 1 of Schedule 14 and the italic heading immediately before that paragraph (minor and consequential amendments);

(e)section 43(5) of the Mental Health Act 1983 (power of magistrates’ courts to commit for restriction order);

(f)section 26(5) of the Criminal Justice Act 1991 (alteration of certain penalties);

(g)in the Criminal Justice Act 2003—

(i)paragraphs 1 and 2 of Schedule 25 and the italic heading immediately before those paragraphs (summary offences no longer punishable with imprisonment), and

(ii)paragraphs 145 and 146 of Schedule 32 and the italic heading immediately before those paragraphs (amendments relating to sentencing);

(h)paragraph 18 of Schedule 8 to the Serious Organised Crime and Police Act 2005 (powers of accredited persons).

(4)In section 81 of the Public Health Acts Amendment Act 1907 (extending definition of public place and street for certain purposes), omit the words from “shall”, in the first place it occurs, to “public place, and”.

(5)In section 48(2) of the Forestry Act 1967 (powers of entry and enforcement), omit “or against the Vagrancy Act 1824”.

(6)In the Police Reform Act 2002—

(a)in Schedule 3C (powers of community support officers and community support volunteers)—

(i)omit paragraph 3(3)(b),

(ii)omit paragraph 7(3),

(iii)in paragraph 7(4), omit “or (3)”, and

(iv)in paragraph 7(7)(a), omit “or (3)”, and

(b)in Schedule 5 (powers exercisable by accredited persons), omit paragraph 2(3)(aa).

(7)In the Sentencing Code—

(a)in section 20(1) (committal in certain cases where offender committed in respect of another offence)—

(i)at the end of paragraph (e), insert “or”, and

(ii)omit paragraph (g) (and the “or” immediately before it), and

(b)omit section 24(1)(f) (further powers to commit offender to the Crown Court to be dealt with).

(8)The amendments and repeals made by this section do not apply in relation to an offence committed before this section comes into force.

Commencement Information

I19	S. 81 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

Expedited public spaces protection orders
82Expedited public spaces protection orders
(1)The Anti-social Behaviour, Crime and Policing Act 2014 is amended as follows.

(2)After section 59 insert—

“59APower to make expedited public spaces protection orders
(1)A local authority may make an expedited public spaces protection order (an “expedited order”) in relation to a public place within the local authority’s area if satisfied on reasonable grounds that three conditions are met.

(2)The first condition is that the public place is in the vicinity of—

(a)a school in the local authority’s area, or

(b)a site in the local authority’s area where, or from which—

(i)vaccines are provided to members of the public by, or pursuant to arrangements with, an NHS body, or

(ii)test and trace services are provided.

The reference in paragraph (b)(i) to arrangements includes arrangements made by the NHS body in the exercise of functions of another person by virtue of any provision of the National Health Service Act 2006.
(3)The second condition is that activities carried on, or likely to be carried on, in the public place by one or more individuals in the course of a protest or demonstration have had, or are likely to have, the effect of—

(a)harassing or intimidating members of staff or volunteers at the school or site,

(b)harassing or intimidating persons using the services of the school or site,

(c)impeding the provision of services by staff or volunteers at the school or site, or

(d)impeding access by persons seeking to use the services of the school or site.

(4)The third condition is that the effect or likely effect mentioned in subsection (3)—

(a)is, or is likely to be, of a persistent or continuing nature,

(b)is, or is likely to be, such as to make the activities unreasonable, and

(c)justifies the restrictions imposed by the order.

(5)An expedited order is an order that identifies the public place referred to in subsection (1) (“the restricted area”) and—

(a)prohibits specified things being done in the restricted area,

(b)requires specified things to be done by persons carrying on specified activities in that area, or

(c)does both of those things.

(6)The only prohibitions or requirements that may be imposed are ones that are reasonable to impose in order—

(a)to prevent the harassment, intimidation or impediment referred to in subsection (3) from continuing, occurring or recurring, or

(b)to reduce that harassment, intimidation or impediment or to reduce the risk of its continuance, occurrence or recurrence.

(7)A prohibition or requirement may be framed—

(a)so as to apply to all persons, or only to persons in specified categories, or to all persons except those in specified categories;

(b)so as to apply at all times, or only at specified times, or at all times except those specified;

(c)so as to apply in all circumstances, or only in specified circumstances, or in all circumstances except those specified.

(8)An expedited order must—

(a)identify the activities referred to in subsection (3);

(b)explain the effect of section 63 (where it applies) and section 67;

(c)specify the period for which the order has effect.

(9)An expedited order may not be made in relation to a public place if that place (or any part of it) is or has been the subject of an expedited order (“the earlier order”), unless the period specified in subsection (11) has expired.

(10)In subsection (9) the second reference to “an expedited order” is to be read as including a reference to a public spaces protection order (made after the day on which this section comes into force) which neither prohibited nor required anything that could not have been prohibited or required by an expedited order.

(11)The period specified in this subsection is the period of a year beginning with the day on which the earlier order ceased to have effect.

(12)An expedited order must be published in accordance with regulations made by the Secretary of State.

(13)For the purposes of subsection (2), a public place that is coextensive with, includes, or is wholly or partly within, a school or site is regarded as being “in the vicinity of” that school or site.

(14)In this section references to a “school” are to be read as including a 16 to 19 Academy.

(15)In this section “test and trace services” means—

(a)in relation to England, services of the programme known as NHS Test and Trace;

(b)in relation to Wales, services of the programme known as Test, Trace, Protect.”

(3)After section 60 insert—

“60ADuration of expedited orders
(1)An expedited order may not have effect for a period of more than 6 months.

(2)Subject to subsection (1), the local authority that made an expedited order may, before the time when the order is due to expire, extend the period for which the order has effect if satisfied on reasonable grounds that doing so is necessary to prevent—

(a)occurrence or recurrence after that time of the activities identified in the order, or

(b)an increase in the frequency or seriousness of those activities after that time.

(3)Where a local authority has made an expedited order, the authority may, at any time before the order is due to expire, reduce the period for which the order is to have effect if satisfied on reasonable grounds that the reduced period will be sufficient having regard to the degree of risk of an occurrence, recurrence or increase such as is mentioned in subsection (2)(a) or (b).

(4)An extension or reduction under this section of the period for which an order has effect must be published in accordance with regulations made by the Secretary of State.

(5)An expedited order may be extended or reduced under this section more than once.”

(4)After section 72 insert—

“72AExpedited orders: Convention rights and consents
(1)A local authority, in deciding—

(a)whether to make an expedited order (under section 59A) and if so what it should include,

(b)whether to extend or reduce the period for which an expedited order has effect (under section 60A) and if so by how much,

(c)whether to vary an expedited order (under section 61) and if so how, or

(d)whether to discharge an expedited order (under section 61),

must have particular regard to the rights of freedom of expression and freedom of assembly set out in articles 10 and 11 of the Convention.
(2)In subsection (1) “Convention” has the meaning given by section 21(1) of the Human Rights Act 1998.

(3)A local authority must obtain the necessary consents before—

(a)making an expedited order,

(b)extending or reducing the period for which an expedited order has effect, or

(c)varying or discharging an expedited order.

(4)If the order referred to in subsection (3) was made, or is proposed to be made, in reliance on section 59A(2)(a), “the necessary consents” means the consent of—

(a)the chief officer of police for the police area that includes the restricted area, and

(b)a person authorised (whether in specific or general terms) by the appropriate authority for the school or 16 to 19 Academy.

(5)If the order referred to in subsection (3) was made, or is proposed to be made, in reliance on section 59A(2)(b), “the necessary consents” means the consent of—

(a)the chief officer of police for the police area that includes the restricted area, and

(b)a person authorised by the appropriate NHS authority.

(6)In this section—

“appropriate authority” means—
(a)
in relation to a school maintained by a local authority, the governing body;

(b)
in relation to any other school or a 16 to 19 Academy, the proprietor;

“appropriate NHS authority” means—
(a)
if the order was made, or is proposed to be made, in reliance on sub-paragraph (i) of section 59A(2)(b), the NHS body mentioned in that sub-paragraph;

(b)
if the order was made, or is proposed to be made, in reliance on sub-paragraph (ii) of section 59A(2)(b) and the site is in England, the UK Health Security Agency;

(c)
if the order was made, or is proposed to be made, in reliance on that sub-paragraph and the site is in Wales, the Local Health Board for the area in which the site is located.

(7)In this section “proprietor”, in relation to a school or a 16 to 19 Academy, has the meaning given in section 579(1) of the Education Act 1996.

72BConsultation and notifications after making expedited order
(1)A local authority must carry out the necessary consultation as soon as reasonably practicable after making an expedited order.

(2)In subsection (1) “necessary consultation” means consulting with the following about the terms and effects of the order—

(a)the chief officer of police, and the local policing body, for the police area that includes the restricted area;

(b)whatever community representatives the local authority thinks it appropriate to consult;

(c)the owner or occupier of land within the restricted area.

(3)A local authority must carry out the necessary notification (if any) as soon as reasonably practicable after—

(a)making an expedited order,

(b)extending or reducing the period for which an expedited order has effect, or

(c)varying or discharging an expedited order.

(4)In subsection (3) “necessary notification” means notifying the following of the extension, reduction, variation or discharge—

(a)the parish council or community council (if any) for the area that includes the restricted area;

(b)in the case of an expedited order made by a district council in England, the county council (if any) for the area that includes the restricted area;

(c)the owner or occupier of land within the restricted area.

(5)The requirement to notify the owner or occupier of land within the restricted area—

(a)does not apply to land that is owned or occupied by the local authority;

(b)applies only if, and to the extent that, it is reasonably practicable to notify the owner or occupier of the land.”

(5)Schedule 7 contains amendments relating to subsections (1) to (4).

Commencement Information

I20	S. 82 in force at Royal Assent for specified purposes, see s. 208(4)(n)

I21	S. 82 in force at 28.6.2022 in so far as not already in force by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

Explanatory Notes - Part 3: Public order

Section 78: Intentionally or recklessly causing public nuisance
709. This Section replaces the existing common law offence of public nuisance as it applies to in England and Wales with a statutory offence of intentionally or recklessly causing public nuisance.
710. Subsections (1) and (2) set out the elements of the offence. The offence applies where a person does an act, or fails to act in circumstances where they are required to do so by law, and the act or omission causes serious harm to the public or a section of the public, or that the act or omission obstructs the public or a section of the public in the exercise or enjoyment of a right that may be exercised or enjoyed by the public at large. Serious harm is defined in subsection (2). The person must have intended their act or omission would have such a consequence, or was reckless as to whether it would have such a consequence.
711. Subsection (3) provides for a reasonableness defence, allowing for a person to prove that they had a reasonable excuse for the act or omission. The burden of proof is placed on the defendant as the facts as to whether they have a reasonable excuse will be within their knowledge. The prosecution will still need to have proved all the elements of the offence to the criminal standard of proof, including the serious harm or obstruction that arises as a result of the act or omission, and the defendant intended or was reckless as to serious harm or obstruction. Although not explicit set out, the standard to which the defendant will be required to prove the defence is the balance of probabilities.
712. Subsections (4) and (5) set the maximum penalty for the offence, namely six months’ imprisonment (rising to 12 months on the commencement of the increase in magistrates’ courts sentencing powers provided for in the Sentencing Act 2000) and/or an unlimited fine on summary conviction, and 10 years’ imprisonment and/or an unlimited fine on conviction on indictment.
713. Subsection (6) abolishes the common law offence of public nuisance.
714. Subsection (7) provides that the new statutory offence does not have retrospective effect. Actions or omissions that occurred or began before the coming into force of this subsection cannot form part of this offence.
715. Subsection (8) makes provision for civil and other criminal liability.

Section 81: Repeal of the Vagrancy Act 1824 etc
731. Subsection (1) repeals the Vagrancy Act 1824. Much of the Vagrancy Act 1824 has already been repealed but substantive provisions remain in sections 3 and 4. Section 3 criminalises begging ("[every person wandering abroad, or placing himself or herself in any public place, street, highway, court, or passage, to beg or gather alms, or causing or procuring or encouraging any child or children so to do…") and section 4 (‘Persons committing certain offences to be deemed rogues and vagabonds’) creates a range of offences including persons who sleep in the open air, or in any deserted or unoccupied building.
732. Subsections (3) to (7) make consequential amendments and repeals to other enactments.
733. Subsection (8) provides that the amendments and repeals made by this section do not apply to an offence committed before this section comes into force.

Section 82: Expedited public spaces protection orders
734. This section amends the Anti-social Behaviour, Crime and Policing Act 2014 to introduce a process by which the implementation of a Public Spaces Protection Order ("PSPO") can be expedited under specific circumstances.
735. New section 59A provides the powers to make an expeditated PSPO. New subsection 59A(1), provides that a local authority may make an expedited PSPO (an "expedited order") in relation to a public place within the local authority’s area if satisfied on reasonable grounds that three conditions are met.
736. New subsections 59A(2) to (4) stipulate the three conditions. Firstly, the public spaces where an expedited order can be applied – schools (including a 16 to 19 Academy), vaccination, and NHS Test & Trace/Test, Trace, Protect sites. Secondly, what activities must be or likely to be carried out in the public spaces – the harassment, intimidation or impediment of those who provide or access the services of the site. Finally, what effect or likely the qualifying activities must be – is, or likely to be, persistent or continuing; make, or likely make, the activities of the site unreasonable; and justify the restrictions imposed by the expedited order.
737. New subsection 59A(5) provides that an expedited order can prohibit and/or require specific activities within a "restricted area" in the public space the order applies to.
738. New subsections 59A(6) and (7) specify the scope of prohibitions and requirements. Subsection (6) requires that prohibitions or requirements are reasonable to prevent or reduce the activities specified in subsection (3). Subsection (7) enables prohibitions and requirements to apply to all or specific categories of persons, all or specified times, all or specified circumstances.
739. New subsection 59A(8) provides that an expedited order must identify the activities it seeks to address and specify how long the order has effect. It must also explain the effects of section 63 of the Anti-social Behaviour, Crime and Policing Act 2014 (consumption of alcohol) if applicable and section 67 of the Act (failing to comply with an order). Under section 67 it is an offence, without reasonable excuse, to fail to comply with a PSPO; the offence carries a maximum penalty of a level 3 fine (currently £1,000).
740. New subsections 59A(9) to (11) provide that an expedited order may not be made in relation to a public place if that place or a part of it has been subject to a PSPO, expedited or otherwise, in the past year. This only applies to regular PSPOs which prohibited or required activity which could have been prohibited or required by an expedited PSPO.
741. New subsection 59A(12) requires that an expedited order be published in accordance with regulations made by the Secretary of State.
742. New section 60A stipulates that an expedited order can last no longer than six months. The Local Authority that made the expedited order may reduce or extend the duration of the expedited order, as many times as necessary, provided it does not exceed the maximum duration of six months. To extend the period, the Local Authority must be satisfied that it is necessary to prevent the activities identified in the order. Similarly to when making the order, any variation must be published in accordance with regulations made by the Secretary of State.
743. New section 72A makes provision about convention rights and consents relating to expediated orders. Local authorities must have particular regard to the rights of freedom of expression and freedom of assembly when making a decision about an expeditated order. The necessary consents must be obtained before a decision is made about an expediated order. In call case, consent must be obtained from the chief officer for the police of the area impacted. For expedited PSPOs related to schools, the consent of the appropriate authority is also needed. For expedited PSPOs related to vaccination sites, the appropriate NHS body. For expedited PSPOs related to test and trace site in England, the UK Security Agency must give consent, and for a test and trace site in Wales, the Local Health Board for the area in which the site is located must give consent.
744. New section 72B provides detail on the consultation and notifications after making an expediated order. Local authorities must carry out the necessary consultation as soon as reasonably practicable after making an expedited order. The necessary consultation means consulting with the chief officer of police, the Police and Crime Commissioner (or the equivalent in London), the owner or occupier of the land, and any representatives of the local community they consider appropriate – for example the leadership team of the school impacted. These requirements also apply to decisions to extend the period of, vary or discharge an order. In addition, the county council and any parish or community council must be informed.


PART 4

Unauthorised encampments
83Offence relating to residing on land without consent in or with a vehicle
(1)At the beginning of Part 5 of the Criminal Justice and Public Order Act 1994, before the italic heading before section 61, insert—

“Residing on land without consent in or with a vehicle
60COffence relating to residing on land without consent in or with a vehicle
(1)Subsection (2) applies where—

(a)a person aged 18 or over (“P”) is residing, or intending to reside, on land without the consent of the occupier of the land,

(b)P has, or intends to have, at least one vehicle with them on the land,

(c)one or more of the conditions mentioned in subsection (4) is satisfied, and

(d)the occupier, a representative of the occupier or a constable requests P to do either or both of the following—

(i)leave the land;

(ii)remove from the land property that is in P’s possession or under P’s control.

(2)P commits an offence if—

(a)P fails to comply with the request as soon as reasonably practicable, or

(b)P—

(i)enters (or having left, re-enters) the land within the prohibited period with the intention of residing there without the consent of the occupier of the land, and

(ii)has, or intends to have, at least one vehicle with them on the land.

(3)The prohibited period is the period of 12 months beginning with the day on which the request was made.

(4)The conditions are—

(a)in a case where P is residing on the land, significant damage or significant disruption has been caused or is likely to be caused as a result of P’s residence;

(b)in a case where P is not yet residing on the land, it is likely that significant damage or significant disruption would be caused as a result of P’s residence if P were to reside on the land;

(c)that significant damage or significant disruption has been caused or is likely to be caused as a result of conduct carried on, or likely to be carried on, by P while P is on the land;

(d)that significant distress has been caused or is likely to be caused as a result of offensive conduct carried on, or likely to be carried on, by P while P is on the land.

(5)A person guilty of an offence under this section is liable on summary conviction to imprisonment for a term not exceeding three months or a fine not exceeding level 4 on the standard scale, or both.

(6)In proceedings for an offence under this section it is a defence for the accused to show that the accused had a reasonable excuse for—

(a)failing to comply as soon as reasonably practicable with the request mentioned in subsection (1)(d), or

(b)after receiving such a request, entering (or re-entering) the land with the intention of residing there without the consent of the occupier of the land.

(7)In its application to common land, this section has effect—

(a)in a case where the common land is land to which the public has access and the occupier cannot be identified, as if references to the occupier were references to the local authority in relation to the common land;

(b)in a case where P’s residence or intended residence without the consent of the occupier is, or would be, an infringement of the commoners’ rights and—

(i)the occupier is aware of P’s residence or intended residence and had an opportunity to consent to it, or

(ii)if sub-paragraph (i) does not apply, any one or more of the commoners took reasonable steps to try to inform the occupier of P’s residence or intended residence and provide an opportunity to consent to it,

as if in subsection (1)(d) after “a constable” there were inserted “or the commoners or any of them or their representative”.
(8)In this section--

“common land” and “commoner” have the same meaning as in section 61;
“damage” includes—
(a)
damage to the land;

(b)
damage to any property on the land not belonging to P;

(c)
damage to the environment (including excessive noise, smells, litter or deposits of waste);

“disruption” includes interference with—
(a)
a person’s ability to access any services or facilities located on the land or otherwise make lawful use of the land, or

(b)
a supply of water, energy or fuel;

“land” does not include buildings other than—
(a)
agricultural buildings within the meaning of paragraphs 3 to 8 of Schedule 5 to the Local Government Finance Act 1988, or

(b)
scheduled monuments within the meaning of the Ancient Monuments and Archaeological Areas Act 1979;

“the local authority”, in relation to common land, has the same meaning as in section 61;
“occupier” means the person entitled to possession of the land by virtue of an estate or interest held by the person;
“offensive conduct” means—
(a)
the use of threatening, abusive or insulting words or behaviour, or disorderly behaviour, or

(b)
the display of any writing, sign, or other visible representation that is threatening, abusive or insulting;

“vehicle” includes—
(a)
any vehicle, whether or not it is in a fit state for use on roads, and includes any chassis or body, with or without wheels, appearing to have formed part of such a vehicle, and any load carried by, and anything attached to, such a vehicle, and

(b)
a caravan as defined in section 29(1) of the Caravan Sites and Control of Development Act 1960.

(9)For the purposes of this section a person is to be considered as residing or having the intention to reside in a place even if that residence or intended residence is temporary, and a person may be regarded as residing or having an intention to reside in a place notwithstanding that the person has a home elsewhere.

60DOffence under section 60C: seizure of property etc
(1)If a constable reasonably suspects that an offence has been committed under section 60C, the constable may seize and remove any relevant property that appears to the constable—

(a)to belong to the person who the constable suspects has committed the offence (“P”);

(b)to be in P’s possession; or

(c)to be under P’s control.

(2)“Relevant property” means—

(a)a vehicle (wherever located) which, for the purposes of section 60C(1)(b) (in the case of an offence under section 60C(2)(a)) or for the purposes of section 60C(2)(b)(ii) (in the case of an offence under section 60C(2)(b)), the constable suspects P had or intended to have with them, or

(b)any other property that is on the relevant land.

(3)The “relevant land” is the land in respect of which a request under section 60C(1)(d) is made.

(4)The relevant chief officer of police may retain any property that has been seized under subsection (1) until the end of the period of three months beginning with the day of the seizure (“the relevant period”).

(5)But the relevant chief officer of police ceases to be entitled to retain the property if before the end of the relevant period a custody officer gives written notice to P that P is not to be prosecuted for the offence under section 60C in relation to which the property was seized.

(And see subsection (10)).
(6)Subsection (7) applies where before the end of the relevant period proceedings for an offence under section 60C are commenced against P.

(7)Where this subsection applies the relevant chief officer of police may retain the property seized until the conclusion of proceedings relating to the offence (including any appeal) (but see subsection (10)).

(8)Where a chief officer of police ceases to be entitled to retain property under this section the chief officer must, subject to any order for forfeiture under section 60E, return it to the person whom the chief officer believes to be its owner.

(9)If a chief officer of police cannot after reasonable inquiry identify a person for the purposes of subsection (8)—

(a)the chief officer must apply to a magistrates’ court for directions, and

(b)the court must make an order about the treatment of the property.

(10)If at any time a person other than P satisfies a chief officer of police that property that is retained by the chief officer under this section—

(a)belongs to the person at that time, and

(b)belonged to them at the time of the suspected offence under section 60C,

the chief officer must return the property to the person.
(11)Subsection (10) does not apply in relation to a vehicle belonging to a person other than P if the chief officer of police reasonably believes that the vehicle was, with the consent of the other person, in P’s possession or under P’s control at the time of the suspected offence under section 60C.

(12)For the purposes of subsection (6), proceedings are commenced when—

(a)a written charge is issued under section 29(1) of the Criminal Justice Act 2003,

(b)a person is charged under Part 4 of the Police and Criminal Evidence Act 1984, or

(c)an information is laid under section 1 of the Magistrates’ Courts Act 1980.

(13)For the purposes of this section—

(a)the relevant chief officer of police is the chief officer of the police force for the area in which the property was seized, and

(b)“vehicle” has the same meaning as in section 60C.

60EOffence under section 60C: forfeiture
(1)A court that convicts a person of an offence under section 60C may order any property to which subsection (2) applies to be forfeited and dealt with in a manner specified in the order.

(2)This subsection applies to any property that—

(a)was seized under section 60D(1), and

(b)is retained by a chief officer of police under that section.

(3)Before making an order for the forfeiture of property the court must—

(a)permit anyone who claims to be its owner or to have an interest in it to make representations, and

(b)consider its value and the likely consequences of forfeiture.”

(2)In the heading to Part 5 of the Criminal Justice and Public Order Act 1994, after “Order:” insert “Unauthorised encampments and ”.

Commencement Information

I1	S. 83 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(i)

84Amendments to existing powers
(1)The Criminal Justice and Public Order Act 1994 is amended as follows.

(2)Section 61 (power to remove trespassers on land) is amended in accordance with subsections (3) to (7).

(3)In subsection (1)—

(a)in paragraph (a), after “persons” insert “—

(i)in the case of persons trespassing on land in England and Wales, has caused damage, disruption or distress (see subsection (10));

(ii)in the case of persons trespassing on land in Scotland,”, and

(b)at the beginning of paragraph (b) insert “in either case,”.

(4)In subsection (4)(b) for “period of three months beginning with the day on which the direction was given” substitute “prohibited period”.

(5)After subsection (4) insert—

“(4ZA)The prohibited period is—

(a)in the case of a person trespassing on land in England and Wales, the period of twelve months beginning with the day on which the direction was given;

(b)in the case of a person trespassing on land in Scotland, the period of three months beginning with the day on which the direction was given.”

(6)In subsection (9), in the definition of “land”, in paragraph (b)—

(a)in the words before sub-paragraph (i), after “land” insert “in Scotland”, and

(b)omit sub-paragraph (i) (together with the final “or”).

(7)After subsection (9) insert—

“(10)For the purposes of subsection (1)(a)(i)—

“damage” includes—
(a)
damage to the land;

(b)
damage to any property on the land not belonging to the persons trespassing;

(c)
damage to the environment (including excessive noise, smells, litter or deposits of waste);

“disruption” includes an interference with—
(a)
a person’s ability to access any services or facilities located on the land or otherwise make lawful use of the land, or

(b)
a supply of water, energy or fuel;

“distress” means distress caused by—
(a)
the use of threatening, abusive or insulting words or behaviour, or disorderly behaviour, or

(b)
the display of any writing, sign, or other visible representation that is threatening, abusive or insulting.”

(8)In section 62 (powers to seize property related to offence under section 61)—

(a)in subsection (1)(b) for “period of three months beginning with the day on which the direction was given” substitute “prohibited period”, and

(b)after subsection (1) insert—

“(1A)The prohibited period is—

(a)in the case of a person trespassing on land in England and Wales, the period of twelve months beginning with the day on which the direction was given;

(a)in the case of a person trespassing on land in Scotland, the period of three months beginning with the day on which the direction was given.”

(9)In section 62B(2) (failure to comply with direction under section 62A: offences) for “3” substitute “twelve”.

(10)In section 62C(2) (failure to comply with direction under section 62A: seizure) for “3” substitute “twelve”.

(11)In section 68(5) (offence of aggravated trespass), for paragraph (a) substitute—

“(a)a highway unless it is a footpath, bridleway or byway open to all traffic within the meaning of Part 3 of the Wildlife and Countryside Act 1981, is a restricted byway within the meaning of Part 2 of the Countryside and Rights of Way Act 2000 or is a cycle track under the Highways Act 1980 or the Cycle Tracks Act 1984;

(aa)a road within the meaning of the Roads (Scotland) Act 1984 unless it falls within the definitions in section 151(2)(a)(ii) or (b) (footpaths and cycle tracks) of that Act or is a bridleway within the meaning of section 47 of the Countryside (Scotland) Act 1967; or”.

(12)The amendments made by subsections (4), (5), (8), (9) and (10) do not apply in relation to a direction given under section 61 or 62A of the Criminal Justice and Public Order Act 1994 before the coming into force of this section.

Commencement Information

I2	S. 84 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(i)

85Guidance on exercise of police powers in respect of trespassers on land etc
After section 62E of the Criminal Justice and Public Order Act 1994 insert—
“62FGuidance
(1)The Secretary of State must issue guidance relating to the exercise of—

(a)the functions of police officers in England and Wales, and

(b)the functions of constables in England and Wales,

under the provisions mentioned in subsection (2).
(2)Those provisions are—

(a)sections 60C to 62E, and

(b)regulations under section 67 relating to vehicles seized under section 62(1) or section 62C(3).

(3)Police officers in England and Wales and constables in England and Wales must have regard to the guidance when exercising any of those functions conferred on them.

(4)The Secretary of State may from time to time revise the guidance.

(5)The Secretary of State must arrange for the guidance and any revised guidance issued under this section to be published in such manner as the Secretary of State considers appropriate.

(6)The Secretary of State must lay before Parliament a copy of any guidance or revised guidance published under subsection (5).”

Commencement Information

I3	S. 85 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(i)

Explanatory Notes:
Section 83: Offence relating to residing on land without consent in or with a vehicle
745. Section 83 inserts new sections 60C to 60E into the 1994 Act. New section 60C introduces a criminal offence of residing or intending to reside on land without consent in or with a vehicle. An offence is committed if a person aged 18 or over ("P") is residing or is intending to reside on land without the consent of an occupier of the land and they have or intend to have at least one vehicle with them on the land, one or more of the conditions mentioned in subsection (4) is satisfied; and P, without reasonable excuse, fails to comply as soon as reasonably practicable with a request made by an occupier of the land, a representative of an occupier, or a constable, to leave the land and remove from the land property which is in P’s possession or under P’s control. P also commits an offence if, without reasonable excuse, they enter or re-enter the land within 12 months of a request to leave with an intention of residing there without the consent of the occupier and they have or intend to have at least one vehicle with them on the land.
746. The person must be residing in or intending to reside in, or with, a vehicle. This means that the provisions do not capture ramblers or prevent those who wish to enjoy the countryside from doing so.
747. The conditions in the new section 60C(2) are: (a) in a case where P is residing on the land, that significant damage or significant disruption has been caused or is likely to be caused as a result of P’s residence; (b) where P is not yet residing on the land, it is likely that significant damage or significant disruption would be caused as a result of P’s residence if P were to reside on the land; (c) that significant damage or significant disruption has been caused or is likely to be caused as a result of conduct carried on, or likely to be carried on, by P while P is on the land; or (d) that significant distress has been caused or is likely to be caused as a result of offensive conduct carried on or likely to be carried on by P while P is on the land.
748. An offence is therefore committed, and powers of arrest available, (provided the other conditions above are met) where a person has first been asked to leave by an occupier, their representative or a constable (so it is made clear to the person that they do not have permission to be on that land). This means there is no requirement for a constable to first issue a direction for the person to leave before an arrest can be made (senior officers have powers to direct trespassers away from land in section 61 of the 1994 Act before an arrest can be made and may only arrest if the person, without reasonable excuse, fails to leave the land as soon as reasonably practicable following a request to do so or they, having left, enter the land again as a trespasser within a specified period).
749. The offence applies where significant damage, disruption or distress has been caused or is likely to be caused and, without reasonable excuse, the person does not leave when asked to do so, removing their property. The qualifying condition of ‘significant’ means that a higher threshold must be met than that under section 61 of the 1994 Act for tackling trespassers on land, where a power to direct can be caught by P causing a lower level of harm (to note, as below, these provisions amend section 61 to broaden the types of harm that can be caught by the power to direct). This qualification in the new offence helps to ensure that the offence and powers of arrest, seizure and forfeiture (see below) are proportionate.
750. New section 60C(6) provides a reasonable excuse defence, allowing a person to show that they had a reasonable excuse for failing to comply as soon as reasonably practicable with a request from an occupier, their representative or a constable or, after receiving such a request, for entering or re-entering the land with the intention of residing there without the consent of the occupier of the land. The burden of proof is placed on P as the facts as to whether they have a reasonable excuse will be within their knowledge. The prosecution will still need to have proved all the elements of the offence to the criminal standard of proof, including the significant damage, disruption or distress and the intention to reside on the land without the consent of the occupier in or with a vehicle. Although not explicitly set out, the standard to which the defendant will be required to prove the defence is the balance of probabilities.
751. New section 60C(7) includes provision relating to the application of the offence under section 60C in relation to common land. New section 60C(7)(a) provides that, in relation to common land to which the public has access and where the occupier of the land cannot be identified, a local authority is to be treated as the "occupier". This means that, in these cases, a person must not reside or intend to reside on the land without the consent of the local authority and a local authority can request that a person leaves the land and removes their property. Where an occupier can be identified, however, this provision ensures that the consent of the local authority will be irrelevant to the offence.
752. New section 60C(7)(b) also enables a commoner to request that a person leaves the land and removes their property where a person’s residence or intended residence without the consent of the occupier is or would be an infringement of the commoner’s rights and: a)the occupier is aware of the person’s residence or intended residence and had an opportunity to consent to it; or b) if that does not apply, any one or more of the commoners took reasonable steps to try to inform the occupier of the person’s residence or intended residence and provide an opportunity to consent to it. This provides a commoner with powers to act (by way of request to leave) where their rights are infringed but helps to ensure that an occupier is afforded the opportunity to consent before they do so. The conditions in new section 60C(1) ensure that an offence is not committed where an occupier consents to the person’s residence or intended residence.
753. New section 60C(8) sets out non-exhaustive definitions for "damage" and "disruption" (for distress, an exhaustive definition of "offensive conduct" is provided) to capture the wide variety of impacts caused by persons residing on land in or with vehicles without consent. Damage includes physical damage, being "damage to the land" and non-physical damage, being "damage to the environment" which includes excessive noise, smells, litter or deposits of waste. Disruption includes a person’s ability to access any facilities located on the land or otherwise make lawful use of the land or a supply of water, energy or fuel.
754. The maximum penalty for the offence is three months’ imprisonment, a level 4 fine (currently £2,500), or both (new section 60C(5).
755. Where a constable reasonably suspects that an offence has been committed under new section 60C, new section 60D confers on a constable powers to seize and remove any relevant property (defined in new section 60D(2)) that appears to belong to the person who the constable suspects has committed the offence, is in their possession or under their control. This property includes a vehicle, if the constable suspects the person had this with them or intended to have this with them in commission of an offence under new section 60C.
756. Property seized under new section 60D may be retained by the chief officer of the police force for the area in which the property was seized for up to three months from the date of seizure or, if criminal proceedings are commenced, until the conclusion of those proceedings. New section 60D(5) ensures that a chief officer of police ceases to be entitled to retain the property if written notice is provided to P that they are not to be prosecuted for an offence under new section 60C.
757. New section 60D(8) ensures that property must be returned by the chief officer of police to the person believed to be the owner, subject to any order of forfeiture under new section 60E, where the chief officer of police ceases to be entitled to retain this.
758. New section 60D(10) to (11) provide that the seized property must be returned to a person if a chief officer of police is satisfied that it belongs to them at that point and belonged to them at the time of the suspected offence but not if the chief officer reasonably believes a vehicle was, with the person’s consent, in P’s possession or control at the time of the suspected offence.
759. Under new section 60E seized property can be forfeited and dealt with in a manner specified by order of the court which convicts P of an offence under new section 60C.
760. Before making an order for forfeiture of the property the court must permit anyone who claims to be the owner or to have an interest in it to make representations and must consider the property’s value and the likely consequences of forfeiture.

Section 84: Amendments to existing powers
761. Subsection (3) amends section 61(1)(a) (power to remove trespassers on land) of the 1994 Act, insofar as it applies to England and Wales, to broaden the types of harm caught by the power of a senior officer to direct trespassers with a common purpose of residing on land to leave the land and remove their property. These now comprise damage, disruption or distress and, unlike for the new offence, these do not need to be "significant" to be caught by the power.
762. Under new section 61(10) (as inserted by subsection (7)), "damage" and "disruption" are afforded the same definitions as in new section 60C; damage, for instance, includes damage to the environment.
763. In line with the existing provision under section 61, a senior officer may direct all trespassers with a common purpose of residing on the land, where he reasonably believes any of them has caused the damage, disruption or distress and reasonable steps have been taken by or on behalf of the occupier to ask them to leave (there is no requirement to reasonably believe the damage, disruption or distress was caused by one particular trespasser).
764. Subsections (4) and (5) amend section 61(4) of the 1994 Act to provide that a person issued with a direction to leave by a senior officer in England and Wales under section 61(1) commits an offence if they, without reasonable excuse, enter the land again as a trespasser within twelve months of the direction. This extends the period of time (from three months) during which the trespasser must not return, strengthening the enforcement action available where a direction is issued.
765. Subsection (6) amends section 61(9) to enable the police to direct trespassers on land that forms part of a highway in England and Wales.
766. Subsection (8) amends section 62(1)(b) of the 1994 Act (powers to seize property related to an offence under section 61) to enable the vehicle of a person to be seized if they, without reasonable excuse, enter land again as a trespasser within twelve months of being issued with a direction under section 61(1).
767. This brings the seizure power in line with the amended period of prohibited return (above) under section 61.
768. Subsection (9) amends section 62B(2) of the 1994 Act (failure to comply with direction under section 62A: offences) to provide that a person commits an offence where they enter any land in the area of the relevant local authority as a trespasser with an intention of residing there within 12 months of being issued with a direction to leave under section 62. Subsection (10) makes equivalent amendment in relation to the power of seizure for an offence committed under section 62B.
769. Subsection (11) amends section 68(5) of the 1994 Act to ensure that the definition of land in that provision remains unamended by these changes, as this section falls outside the scope of this area (but previously referred to the definition of land in section 61).
770. Subsection (12) provides that these changes do not apply to a person issued with a direction before the coming into force of these amendments.

Section 85: Guidance on exercise of police powers in respect of trespassers on land etc
771. This section inserts new section 62F into the 1994 Act which confers a duty on the Secretary of State to issue guidance relating to the exercise by police officers and constables in England and Wales of their functions under sections 60C to 62E of the 1994 Act and under the Regulations made under section 67 relating to vehicles seized under section 62(1) or section 62C(3) (see the Police (Retention and Disposal of Vehicles) Regulations 1995, SI 1995/723).
772. This will support police in discharging their functions to take enforcement action against unauthorised encampments.
773. The Secretary of State may from time to time revise the guidance issued under new section 62F(1). Police officers and constables in England and Wales must have regard to the guidance issued under this Section when exercising any of their functions under sections 60 to 62E of the 1994 Act and under the Regulations made under section 67. The Secretary of State must arrange for the guidance and any revised guidance issued under this section to be published in such manner as the Secretary of State considers appropriate (new section 62F(5)). The Secretary of State must lay before Parliament a copy of any guidance or revised guidance published under new section 62F(5) (new section 62F(6)).


PART 12

Disregards and pardons for certain historical offences
194Disregard of certain convictions or cautions
(1)The Protection of Freedoms Act 2012 is amended in accordance with subsections (2) to (10).

(2)Section 92 (power of Secretary of State to disregard convictions or cautions) is amended in accordance with subsections (3) to (5).

(3)In subsection (1) for the words from “under” to the end of paragraph (c) substitute “in circumstances where the conduct constituting the offence was sexual activity between persons of the same sex”.

(4)In subsection (3)—

(a)in paragraph (a)—

(i)for the first “the” substitute “any”,

(ii)for “conduct constituting the offence consented to it and” substitute “sexual activity”, and

(iii)omit the second “and”, and

(b)for paragraph (b) substitute—

“(b)the offence has been repealed or, in the case of an offence at common law, abolished by enactment (whether or not it has been re-enacted or replaced), and

(c)the sexual activity would not, if occurring in the same circumstances at the point of decision, constitute an offence.”

(5)After subsection (6) insert—

“(7)In this section “sexual activity” includes—

(a)any physical or affectionate activity which is of a type characteristic of people involved in an intimate personal relationship, and

(b)conduct intended to lead to sexual activity.”

(6)In section 93(3) (applications to the Secretary of State), for the words from “the matters” to the end substitute “—

(a)whether a conviction or caution is of a kind mentioned in section 92(1);

(b)the matters mentioned in condition A in that section.”

(7)In section 94 (procedure for decisions by the Secretary of State)—

(a)in subsection (1)—

(i)after “considering” insert “whether a conviction or caution is of a kind mentioned in section 92(1) or”, and

(ii)for “section 92” substitute “that section”,

(b)in subsection (2)—

(i)after “deciding” insert “whether a conviction or caution is of a kind mentioned in section 92(1) or”, and

(ii)for “section 92” substitute “that section”,

(c)after subsection (2) insert—

“(2A)If the Secretary of State refuses an application on the basis that the caution or conviction is not of a kind mentioned in section 92(1), the Secretary of State must—

(a)record the decision in writing, and

(b)give notice of it to the applicant.”

(8)In section 99 (appeal against refusal to disregard convictions or cautions)—

(a)in subsection (1)(a) after “Secretary of State” insert “refuses an application on the basis mentioned in section 94(2A) or”,

(b)in subsection (3), for the words from “that it” to the end substitute “—

(a)that the conviction or caution is of a kind mentioned in section 92(1), it must make an order to that effect;

(b)that it appears as mentioned in condition A of that section, it must make an order to that effect.”, and

(c)in subsection (5), after “subsection (3)” insert “(b)”.

(9)In section 100(1) (advisers)—

(a)for the second “Secretary of State” substitute “Secretary of State—

(a)the caution or conviction is of a kind mentioned in section 92(1), or”,

(b)the remaining text becomes paragraph (b), and

(c)in that paragraph for “section 92” substitute “that section”.

(10)In section 101—

(a)in subsection (1)—

(i)in paragraph (a) of the definition of “conviction”, after “proceedings” insert “(including anything that under section 376(1) and (2) of the Armed Forces Act 2006 is to be treated as a conviction for the purposes of that Act)”,

(ii)at the end of the definition of “sentence” insert “(including anything that under section 376(1) and (3) of the Armed Forces Act 2006 is to be treated as a sentence for the purposes of that Act),”,

(iii)at the end of paragraph (a) of the definition of “service disciplinary proceedings” omit “or”,

(iv)after paragraph (b) of the definition of “service disciplinary proceedings” insert “, or

(c)in respect of a service offence (whether or not before a court but excepting proceedings before a civilian court within the meaning of the Armed Forces Act 2006);”

and for the purposes of paragraph (c) “service offence” means a service offence within the meaning of the Armed Forces Act 2006, or an SDA offence within the meaning of the Armed Forces Act 2006 (Transitional Provisions etc) Order 2009 (SI 2009/1059).”, and
(v)in the appropriate place insert—

““enactment” includes an enactment contained in subordinate legislation (within the meaning of the Interpretation Act 1978),”,
(b)omit subsections (3) and (4),

(c)in subsection (5) for paragraphs (a) and (b) substitute “a reference to an inchoate or ancillary offence relating to the offence.”,

(d)in subsection (6)—

(i)for the first “or incitement” substitute “, incitement, encouraging or assisting”, and

(ii)for the second “or incitement” substitute “, incitement, encouraging or assisting”,

(e)after subsection (6) insert—

“(6A)For the purposes of section 92, an inchoate or ancillary offence is to be treated as repealed or abolished to the extent that the offence to which it relates is repealed or abolished.

(6B)A reference to an inchoate or ancillary offence in relation to an offence is a reference to an offence of—

(a)attempting, conspiracy or incitement to commit the offence,

(b)encouraging or assisting the commission of the offence, or

(c)aiding, abetting, counselling or procuring the commission of the offence.

(6C)For the purposes of section 92, an offence under an enactment mentioned in subsection (6D) is to be treated as repealed to the extent that the conduct constituting the offence under the enactment—

(a)was punishable by reference to an offence under the law of England and Wales which has been repealed or abolished, or

(b)if the conduct was not punishable by the law of England and Wales, was punishable by reference to equivalent conduct constituting an offence under the law of England and Wales which has been repealed or abolished.

(6D)The enactments are—

(a)section 45 of the Naval Discipline Act 1866,

(b)section 41 of the Army Act 1881,

(c)section 41 of the Air Force Act 1917,

(d)section 70 of the Army Act 1955,

(e)section 70 of the Air Force Act 1955,

(f)section 42 of the Naval Discipline Act 1957, and

(g)section 42 of the Armed Forces Act 2006.”, and

(f)in subsection (7) for “(5) and (6)” substitute “(5), (6) and (6B)”.

(11)Nothing in this section affects the disregard of a conviction or caution that was disregarded before this section comes into force.

Commencement Information

I1	S. 194 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I2	S. 194 in force at 13.6.2023 by S.I. 2023/641, reg. 2(a) (with reg. 3)

195Pardons for certain convictions or cautions
(1)The Policing and Crime Act 2017 is amended in accordance with subsections (2) to (13).

(2)Section 164 (posthumous pardons for convictions etc. of certain abolished offences) is amended in accordance with subsections (3) to (10).

(3)Before subsection (1) insert—

“(A1)Subsection (1) applies in relation to a person—

(a)who was convicted of, or cautioned for, an offence in circumstances where the conduct constituting the offence was sexual activity between persons of the same sex, and

(b)who died before the end of the period of twelve months beginning with—

(i)the day on which section 194 of the Police, Crime, Sentencing and Courts Act 2022 comes into force, or

(ii)if later, the day on which the offence referred to in paragraph (a) became an abolished offence (see subsection (1A)).”

(4)For subsection (1) substitute—

“(1)The person is pardoned for the offence if—

(a)any other person involved in the sexual activity was aged 16 or over, and

(b)the offence has become an abolished offence.

(1A)An offence becomes an abolished offence at the point at which conditions A and B are first met.

(1B)Condition A is that the offence has been repealed or, in the case of an offence at common law, abolished by enactment (whether or not it was re-enacted or replaced).

(1C)Condition B is that the sexual activity referred to in subsection (A1)(a) would not, if occurring in the same circumstances, constitute an offence.”

(5)Omit subsections (2) to (6).

(6)In subsection (7)—

(a)for “subsection (8)” substitute “subsections (8) and (8A)”, and

(b)at the end of paragraph (b) insert “(but as if the reference in subsections (6A) and (6C) to section 92 were a reference to this section)”.

(7)In subsection (8) (as amended by section 19 of the Armed Forces Act 2021)—

(a)omit paragraph (ba),

(b)at the end of paragraph (c) omit “or”,

(c)after paragraph (c) (but before paragraph (d) inserted by section 19(3)(d) of the Armed Forces Act 2021) insert—

“(ca)the Mutiny Act 1878, the Marine Mutiny Act 1878, any Act previously in force corresponding to either of those Acts or any relevant Articles of War, or”.

(8)After subsection (8) insert—

“(8A)Section 101(6D) of the 2012 Act is to be read, in its application to this section by virtue of subsection (7) of this section, as if the enactments listed in that subsection included—

(a)Article 2 of Section 20 of the Articles of War of 1749 (offences triable by courts martial outside Great Britain),

(b)section 38 of the Naval Discipline Act 1860,

(c)section 38 of the Naval Discipline Act 1861,

(d)section 41 of the Naval Discipline Act 1864,

(e)Article 93 of Section 2 of the Articles of War of 1876 (offences not specified in Marine Mutiny Act or Articles of War),

(f)section 41 of the Army Discipline and Regulation Act 1879, and

(g)any provision corresponding to the provision mentioned in paragraphs (a) or (e), contained in other relevant Articles of War.”

(9)In subsection (10) (inserted by section 19 of the Armed Forces Act 2021) insert in the appropriate place—

““sexual activity” includes—
(a)
any physical or affectionate activity which is of a type characteristic of people involved in an intimate personal relationship, and

(b)
conduct intended to lead to sexual activity.”

(10)After subsection (10) insert—

“(11)Subsection (1) does not apply in relation to an offence for which the person has previously been pardoned under this section or section 165.”

(11)In section 165(1) (other pardons for convictions etc. of certain abolished offences) after “offence” insert “in the circumstances”.

(12)Omit section 166 (power to provide disregards and pardons for additional abolished offences).

(13)In section 167 (sections 164 to 166: supplementary)—

(a)in the opening words of subsection (1) omit “, or under regulations under 166,”, and

(b)in subsection (2)—

(i)for “sections 164 to 166” substitute “section 164 or 165”, and

(ii)omit “or regulations under section 166”.

(14)Nothing in this section affects a pardon for a conviction or caution which took effect before this section comes into force.

(15)In section 19 of the Armed Forces Act 2021 (posthumous pardons in relation to certain abolished offences), omit subsection (2) and paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (3).

Commencement Information

I3	S. 195 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I4	S. 195 in force at 13.6.2023 by S.I. 2023/641, reg. 2(b)

Explanatory Notes:
Section 194: Disregards and Pardons
1415. Section 194 amended sections 92 to 101 of the Protection of Freedoms Act 2012 ("the 2012 Act") to extend the scope of the disregard schemes.
1416. Subsection (3) amends section 92(1) of the 2012 Act to clarify that the Scheme applies only to sexual activity between individuals of the same sex.
1417. Subsection (4)(a) specifies that any other party to the sexual activity must have been aged 16 years or over.
1418. Subsection (4)(b) brings into the scope of the Scheme any offences that have been repealed in statute or abolished by enactment in common law.
1419. As set out at subsection (4)(b), a conviction or caution is not eligible for a disregard where the activity would amount to an offence at the time the decision is made on the application, or where any other party to the same-sex sexual activity was not aged 16 years or over.
1420. Subsection (5) sets out the definition of ‘sexual activity’. This new definition is broader than that covered by the specified offences in the current Scheme and is intended to reflect the broader range of behaviour covered by the extended scope of the Scheme. Subsection (5) makes clear that the Scheme now covers conduct intended to lead to sexual activity as well as sexual activity itself.
1421. Subsections (6) to (9) make amendments to the decision-making and appeal processes to apply them to the expanded Scheme.
1422. Subsection (10) updates the definitions in section 101 of the 2012 Act to reflect the expanded Scheme, including definitions relating to service offences, and subsection (11) makes clear that the new provisions do not affect disregards which have been granted prior to the new provisions coming into force.

Section 195: Pardons for certain convictions or cautions
1423. Subsection (3) inserts new section 164(A1) of the 2017 Act which extends the provisions for posthumous pardons to align with the extension of the disregard Scheme’s scope. This provides posthumous pardons for those individuals who die prior to the commencement of the extended Scheme or within the twelve months after the commencement. Where an offence is repealed or abolished after the commencement of the extended Scheme, provision is made for those who have died prior to, or within twelve months after, the date of repeal or abolishment, if they fulfil the criteria for a disregard.
1424. Subsection (4) sets out the conditions which must be met for a person to be pardoned.
1425. Subsections (7) to (9) make provision to ensure that the extended Scheme encompasses all historical service offences.
1426. Subsection (10) inserts section 164(11) to ensure that persons who have already received a pardon under section 164 or 165 cannot receive another pardon for the same offence.
1427. Subsection (11) ensures that the provisions for automatic pardons to reflect the extension of the Scheme.
1428. Subsection (12) repeals the power in section 166 of the 2017 Act for the Secretary of State to add further offences to the list of eligible offences within the scope of the original Scheme. This power is no longer necessary because there is no longer a list of eligible offences; rather, all repealed and abolished offences now fall within scope of the Scheme.

Section 11; SCHEDULE 1

Specified authorities and local government areas
Commencement Information

I1	Sch. 1 in force at Royal Assent for specified purposes, see s. 208(4)(b)

I2	Sch. 1 in force at 31.1.2023 in so far as not already in force by S.I. 2022/1227, reg. 4(n)

Local government
Specified authority	Local government area
A district council	The district
A county council in England for an area for which there are no district councils	The district which coincides with the council’s area or, if there is no such district, each district within the council’s area
Any other county council in England	Each district which falls within the council’s area
A London borough council	The London borough
The Common Council of the City of London in its capacity as a local authority	The City of London
The Council of the Isles of Scilly	The Isles of Scilly
A county council in Wales	The county
A county borough council in Wales	The county borough
Criminal justice
Specified authority	Local government area
A provider of probation services within the meaning given by section 3(6) of the Offender Management Act 2007	Each local government area in which the provider operates
A youth offending team established under section 39 of the Crime and Disorder Act 1998	Each local government area which is, or which falls within, the area of each local authority which established the team
Health and social care
Specified authority	Local government area
[F1An integrated care board established under section 14Z25] of the National Health Service Act 2006	Each local government area which, or any part of which, coincides with or falls within [F2the board’s] area
A Local Health Board established under section 11 of the National Health Service (Wales) Act 2006	Each local government area which, or any part of which, coincides with or falls within the Board’s area
Textual Amendments

F1	Words in Sch. 1 Table substituted (1.7.2022) by Health and Care Act 2022 (c. 31), s. 186(6), Sch. 4 para. 243(a); S.I. 2022/734, reg. 2(a), Sch. (with regs. 13, 29, 30)

F2	Words in Sch. 1 Table substituted (1.7.2022) by Health and Care Act 2022 (c. 31), s. 186(6), Sch. 4 para. 243(b); S.I. 2022/734, reg. 2(a), Sch. (with regs. 13, 29, 30)

Police
Specified authority	Local government area
A chief officer of police for a police area in England and Wales	Each local government area which coincides with or falls within the police area
Fire and rescue authorities
Specified authority	Local government area
A fire and rescue authority constituted by a scheme under section 2 of the Fire and Rescue Services Act 2004 or a scheme to which section 4 of that Act applies	Each local government area which, or any part of which, coincides with or falls within the authority’s area
A fire and rescue authority created by an order under section 4A of the Fire and Rescue Services Act 2004	Each local government area which, or any part of which, coincides with or falls within the authority’s area
A metropolitan county fire and rescue authority	Each district which falls within the authority’s area
The London Fire Commissioner	Each London borough and the City of London


Section 82; SCHEDULE 7

Commencement Information

I1	Sch. 7 para. 1 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I2	Sch. 7 para. 1 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

2In the heading of Chapter 2 of Part 4, at the end insert “and expedited orders”.

Commencement Information

I3	Sch. 7 para. 2 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I4	Sch. 7 para. 2 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

3In the italic heading before section 59, at the end insert “and expedited orders”.

Commencement Information

I5	Sch. 7 para. 3 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I6	Sch. 7 para. 3 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

4In the heading of section 59 (power to make orders), before “orders” insert “public spaces protection”.

Commencement Information

I7	Sch. 7 para. 4 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I8	Sch. 7 para. 4 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

5In the heading of section 60 (duration of orders), after “of” insert “public spaces protection”.

Commencement Information

I9	Sch. 7 para. 5 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I10	Sch. 7 para. 5 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

6(1)Section 61 (variation and discharge of orders) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsection (1), in the words before paragraph (a), after “protection order” insert “or expedited order”.

(3)In subsection (2), for “make a variation under subsection (1)(a)” substitute “under subsection (1)(a) make a variation to a public spaces protection order”.

(4)After subsection (2) insert—

“(2A)A local authority may under subsection (1)(a) make a variation to an expedited order that results in the order applying to an area to which it did not previously apply only if the conditions in section 59A(2) to (4) are met as regards that area.”

(5)In subsection (3), after “59(5)” insert “or 59A(6) (as the case may be)”.

(6)In subsection (4), after “order” insert “or expedited order”.

Commencement Information

I11	Sch. 7 para. 6 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I12	Sch. 7 para. 6 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

7(1)Section 62 (premises etc to which alcohol prohibition does not apply) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsection (1), in the words before paragraph (a), after “order” insert “or expedited order”.

(3)In subsection (2), in the words before paragraph (a), after “order” insert “or an expedited order”.

Commencement Information

I13	Sch. 7 para. 7 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I14	Sch. 7 para. 7 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

8In section 63 (consumption of alcohol in breach of prohibition order), in subsection (1)—

(a)in paragraph (a), after “order” insert “or an expedited order”;

(b)in the words after paragraph (b) omit “public spaces protection”.

Commencement Information

I15	Sch. 7 para. 8 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I16	Sch. 7 para. 8 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

9(1)Section 64 (orders restricting public right of way over highway) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsection (1), in the words before paragraph (a), after “order” insert “or expedited order”.

(3)After subsection (1) insert—

“(1A)Before making a public spaces protection order that restricts the public right of way over a highway, a local authority must take the prior consultation steps (see subsection (2)).

(1B)A local authority may not make an expedited order that restricts the public right of way over a highway unless it—

(a)takes the prior consultation steps before making the order, or

(b)takes the subsequent consultation steps (see subsection (2A)) as soon as reasonably practicable after making the order.”

(4)In subsection (2), for the words from “Before” to “must” substitute “To take the “prior consultation steps” in relation to an order means to”.

(5)After subsection (2) insert—

“(2A)To take the “subsequent consultation steps” in relation to an expedited order means to—

(a)notify potentially affected persons of the order,

(b)invite those persons to make representations within a specified period about the terms and effects of the order,

(c)inform those persons how they can see a copy of the order, and

(d)consider any representations made.

The definition of “potentially affected persons” in subsection (2) applies to this subsection as if the reference there to “the proposed order” were to “the order”.”
(6)After subsection (3) insert—

“(3B)Where a local authority proposes to make an expedited order restricting the public right of way over a highway that is also within the area of another local authority it must, if it thinks appropriate to do so, consult that other authority before, or as soon as reasonably practicable after, making the order.”

(7)In subsections (4), (5), (6), (7) and (8), after “order” insert “or expedited order”.

Commencement Information

I17	Sch. 7 para. 9 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I18	Sch. 7 para. 9 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

10In section 65 (categories of highway over which public right of way may not be restricted), in subsection (1), in the words before paragraph (a), after “order” insert “or an expedited order”.

Commencement Information

I19	Sch. 7 para. 10 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I20	Sch. 7 para. 10 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

11(1)Section 66 (challenging validity of orders) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsections (1) and (6), after “public spaces protection order”, in each place it occurs, insert “or an expedited order”.

(3)In subsection (7), in the words before paragraph (a)—

(a)after “order”, in the first place it occurs, insert “or an expedited order”;

(b)for “a public spaces protection”, in the second place it occurs, substitute “such an”.

Commencement Information

I21	Sch. 7 para. 11 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I22	Sch. 7 para. 11 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

12(1)Section 67 (offence of failing to comply with order) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsections (1) and (4), after “order”, in each place it occurs, insert “or an expedited order”.

(3)In subsection (3), after “order” insert “or expedited order”.

Commencement Information

I23	Sch. 7 para. 12 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I24	Sch. 7 para. 12 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

13(1)Section 68 (fixed penalty notices) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsection (1), at the end insert “or an expedited order”.

(3)In subsection (3), at the end insert “or expedited order”.

Commencement Information

I25	Sch. 7 para. 13 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I26	Sch. 7 para. 13 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

14In section 70 (byelaws), after “protection order” insert “or an expedited order”.

Commencement Information

I27	Sch. 7 para. 14 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I28	Sch. 7 para. 14 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

15(1)Section 71 (bodies other than local authorities with statutory functions in relation to land) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsections (3) to (5), after “public spaces protection order”, in each place it occurs, insert “or an expedited order”.

(3)In subsection (6)—

(a)in paragraph (a), after “order” insert “or expedited order”;

(b)in paragraph (b)(i), after “order” insert “, or an expedited order,”.

Commencement Information

I29	Sch. 7 para. 15 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I30	Sch. 7 para. 15 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

16In the heading of section 72 (Convention rights, consultation, publicity and notification), at the beginning insert “Public spaces protection orders:”

Commencement Information

I31	Sch. 7 para. 16 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I32	Sch. 7 para. 16 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)

17(1)Section 74 (interpretation of Chapter 2 of Part 4) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsection (1)—

(a)at the appropriate places insert—

““16 to 19 Academy” has the meaning given by section 1B of the Academies Act 2010;”;
““expedited order” has the meaning given by section 59A(1);”;
““Local Health Board” means a Local Health Board established under section 11 of the National Health Service (Wales) Act 2006;”;
““NHS body” has the meaning given in section 275 of the National Health Service Act 2006;”;
““school” has the meaning given by section 4 of the Education Act 1996.”;
(b)for the definition of “restricted area” substitute—

““restricted area”—
(a)
in relation to a public spaces protection order, has the meaning given by section 59(4);

(b)
in relation to an expedited order, has the meaning given by section 59A(5).”

(3)After subsection (2) insert—

“(3)For the purposes of this Chapter, an expedited order “regulates” an activity if the activity is—

(a)prohibited by virtue of section 59A(5)(a), or

(b)subjected to requirements by virtue of section 59A(5)(b),

whether or not for all persons and at all times.”
Commencement Information

I33	Sch. 7 para. 17 not in force at Royal Assent, see s. 208(1)

I34	Sch. 7 para. 17 in force at 28.6.2022 by S.I. 2022/520, reg. 5(j)


Section 153, SCHEDULE 14
Community and suspended sentence orders: special procedures relating to review and breach
PART 1
Amendments to the Sentencing Code
Introductory
1The Sentencing Code is amended as specified in this Part of this Schedule.

Commencement Information

I1	Sch. 14 para. 1 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

Orders that qualify for special procedures
2After section 395 insert—

“395ACommunity and suspended sentence orders qualifying for special procedures
(1)A community order or suspended sentence order qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of a relevant provision if the order—

(a)is of a description specified in regulations for the purposes of that provision, and

(b)is made within a period, or after a time, so specified.

(2)In subsection (1) “relevant provision” means—

(a)section 217A;

(b)section 293A;

(c)paragraphs 10(5)(ba) and 11(2)(ba) of Schedule 10;

(d)paragraph 13(1)(da) of Schedule 16.

(3)A description specified under subsection (1)(a) may, among other things, be framed by reference to—

(a)the courts by which the orders are made (for example, courts sitting in particular places or areas);

(b)the persons who are subject to the orders (for example, persons of a particular sex);

(c)the offences to which the orders relate.

(4)Where regulations under subsection (1)(a) specify a description of community or suspended sentence order for the first time, they must under subsection (1)(b) specify, in relation to that description of order, a period of 18 months beginning with the day on which the regulations come into force.

(5)Regulations under this section are to be made by the Secretary of State.

(6)Regulations under this section are subject to—

(a)the negative resolution procedure, where under subsection (1)(b) the regulations specify a period, and

(b)the affirmative resolution procedure, in any other case.”

Commencement Information

I2	Sch. 14 para. 2 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

Review of community orders
3(1)Section 211 (power of Crown Court to direct magistrates’ court supervision) is amended as follows.

(2)The existing provision becomes subsection (1).

(3)After that subsection insert—

“(2)Subsection (1) does not apply to a community order that qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of section 217A.”

Commencement Information

I3	Sch. 14 para. 3 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

4In section 217 (power to provide for court review of community orders), after subsection (2) insert—

“(2A)Regulations under this section may not make provision in respect of community orders which for the purposes of section 217A qualify for special procedures.”

Commencement Information

I4	Sch. 14 para. 4 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

5After section 217 insert—

“217AReview of community order qualifying for special procedures
(1)A community order that—

(a)imposes one or more community order requirements, and

(b)qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of this section,

may make provision for the order to be reviewed periodically (“provision for review”).
(2)Where a community order contains provision for review under this section, it must—

(a)specify the intervals at which the order is to be reviewed,

(b)provide for each review to be made, subject to section 217B, at a hearing held for the purpose by the responsible court (a “review hearing”),

(c)require the offender to attend each review hearing, and

(d)provide for a report by an officer of a provider of probation services on the offender’s progress in complying with the community order requirements of the order (a “progress report”) to be made to the responsible court before each review.

(3)In this section “the responsible court”, in relation to a community order, means the court by which the order is made.

(4)For more about community orders that qualify for special procedures, see section 395A.

217BPowers on review
(1)This section applies where a review hearing is held on a review of a community order by virtue of section 217A.

(2)The court may, after considering the progress report, amend—

(a)the community order requirements of the order, or

(b)any provision of the order which relates to those requirements.

(3)But the court—

(a)may not amend the community order requirements of the order so as to impose a requirement of a different kind unless the offender expresses willingness to comply with that requirement,

(b)may not amend—

(i)a mental health treatment requirement,

(ii)a drug rehabilitation requirement, or

(iii)an alcohol treatment requirement,

unless the offender expresses willingness to comply with the requirement as amended, and
(c)except with the consent of the offender, may not amend the order while an appeal against the order is pending.

(4)For the purposes of subsection (3)(a)—

(a)a community order requirement of a kind within any entry in the table in section 201 is of the same kind as any other community requirement within that entry, and

(b)an electronic compliance monitoring requirement is a requirement of the same kind as any requirement within that table to which it relates.

(5)If the court is of the opinion that the offender has without reasonable excuse breached a community order requirement of the order, the court may adjourn the hearing so that the court can deal with the case forthwith under paragraph 10 or 11 of Schedule 10 (powers of court to deal with offender on breach of requirement).

(6)For some powers available where the court is of the opinion referred to in subsection (5) but does not deal with the case forthwith, see paragraph 9A of Schedule 10.

(7)In this section—

“review hearing”, and
“progress report”,
have the same meanings as in section 217A.
217CAlteration of review arrangements
(1)Subsections (2) and (3) apply where a court—

(a)considers the progress report relating to a review under section 217A (the “current review”), and

(b)forms the opinion that the offender’s progress in complying with the community order requirements of the community order is satisfactory.

(2)If the court forms that opinion before a review hearing is held at the current review—

(a)it may order that no review hearing is to be held at the current review, and

(b)it may amend the community order so as to provide for each subsequent review to be held without a review hearing.

(3)If a review hearing is held at the current review, the court may at the hearing amend the community order so as to provide for each subsequent review to be held without a review hearing.

(4)If at a review held without a review hearing the court—

(a)considers the progress report, and

(b)forms the opinion that the offender’s progress under the order is no longer satisfactory,

it may require the offender to attend a hearing of the court at a specified time and place.
(5)At a review hearing the court may amend the community order so as to vary the intervals specified under section 217A(2)(a).

(6)The functions of a court under this section that are exercisable in relation to a review without a hearing are to be exercised—

(a)where the court is the Crown Court, by a judge of the court, and

(b)where the court is a magistrates’ court, by a justice of the peace.

(7)In this section—

“review hearing”, and
“progress report”,
have the same meanings as in section 217A.”
Commencement Information

I5	Sch. 14 para. 5 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

Review of suspended sentence orders
6In section 293 (review of suspended sentence orders), at the end insert—

“(7)Nothing in this section applies in relation to suspended sentence orders which qualify for special procedures for the purposes of section 293A.”

Commencement Information

I6	Sch. 14 para. 6 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

7After section 293 insert—

“293AReview of suspended sentence order qualifying for special procedures
(1)A suspended sentence order that—

(a)imposes one or more community requirements, and

(b)qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of this section,

may make provision for the order to be reviewed periodically (“provision for review”).
(2)Where a suspended sentence order contains provision for review under this section, it must—

(a)specify the intervals at which the order is to be reviewed,

(b)provide for each review to be made, subject to section 294, at a hearing held for the purpose by the responsible court (a “review hearing”),

(c)require the offender to attend each review hearing, and

(d)provide for a report by an officer of a provider of probation services on the offender’s progress in complying with the community requirements of the order (a “progress report”) to be made to the responsible court before each review.

(3)In this section “the responsible court”, in relation to a suspended sentence order, means the court by which the order is made.

(4)For more about suspended sentence orders that qualify for special procedures, see section 395A.”

Commencement Information

I7	Sch. 14 para. 7 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

8(1)Section 294 (review hearings) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsection (1), after “293” insert “or 293A”.

(3)In subsection (5), after “the case” insert “forthwith”.

(4)After subsection (5) insert—

“(5A)For some powers available where the court is of the opinion referred to in subsection (5) but does not deal with the case forthwith, see paragraph 9A of Schedule 16.”

(5)In subsection (6), after “293(2)” insert “(or, as the case may be, section 293A(2))”.

Commencement Information

I8	Sch. 14 para. 8 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

9(1)Section 295 (alteration of review arrangements) is amended as follows.

(2)In subsection (1), after “a review” insert “under section 293 or 293A”.

(3)In subsection (5), after “293(2)(a)” insert “or 293A(2)(a)”.

(4)In subsection (7), after “293(2)” insert “(or, as the case may be, section 293A(2))”.

Commencement Information

I9	Sch. 14 para. 9 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

10(1)Section 297 (power to direct magistrates’ court supervision) is amended as follows.

(2)The existing provision becomes subsection (1).

(3)After that subsection insert—

“(2)Subsection (1) does not apply to a suspended sentence order that qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of section 293A.”

Commencement Information

I10	Sch. 14 para. 10 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

Review of drug rehabilitation requirements
11In Schedule 9 (community orders and suspended sentence orders: community requirements), in paragraph 21 (review of drug rehabilitation requirements), at the end insert—

“(7)Nothing in this paragraph or paragraph 22 applies in relation to—

(a)a community order that qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of section 217A, or

(b)a suspended sentence order that qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of section 293A.”

Commencement Information

I11	Sch. 14 para. 11 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

Breach of community order: power to commit to custody
12(1)Schedule 10 (breach etc of community order) is amended as follows.

(2)In paragraph 1 (interpretation), in the definition of “appropriate court” in sub-paragraph (1)—

(a)after paragraph (a) insert—

“(aa)if the community order qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of section 217A, the court that made the order;”;

(b)in paragraph (b), after the second “order” insert “and does not fall within paragraph (aa)”.

(3)In paragraph 8 (issue of summons or warrant by justice of the peace), in sub-paragraph (3)—

(a)in paragraph (a), omit the final “or”;

(b)after paragraph (a) insert—

“(aa)in the case of a community order that qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of section 217A, before the court that made the order, or”.

(4)After paragraph 9 insert—

Issue of summons or warrant after review hearing
9A(1)This paragraph applies where—

(a)a community order is in force,

(b)on a review hearing under section 217B a magistrates’ court or the Crown Court (“the court”) is of the opinion that the offender has without reasonable excuse breached a community order requirement of the order, and

(c)the court does not deal with the case forthwith by virtue of section 217B(5).

(2)The court may at any time—

(a)issue a summons requiring the offender to appear at the place and time specified in it, or

(b)issue a warrant for the offender’s arrest.

(3)A summons or warrant issued under this paragraph must direct the offender to appear or be brought before the court which issued it.

(4)Where—

(a)a summons is issued under this paragraph, and

(b)the offender does not appear in answer to the summons,

the court may issue a warrant for the arrest of the offender.”
(5)In paragraph 10—

(a)in sub-paragraph (1), after “paragraph 8” insert “or 9A or by virtue of section 217B(5)”;

(b)in sub-paragraph (5), after paragraph (b) insert—

“(ba)if the community order qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of this paragraph, by ordering the offender to be committed to prison for such period not exceeding 28 days as the court considers appropriate (but see also paragraph 13A);”.

(6)In paragraph 11—

(a)in sub-paragraph (1)(a)—

(i)after “paragraph 9” insert “or 9A”;

(ii)after “10(3)” insert “or section 217B(5)”;

(b)in sub-paragraph (2), after paragraph (b) insert—

“(ba)if the community order qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of this paragraph, by ordering the offender to be committed to prison for such period not exceeding 28 days as the court considers appropriate (but see also paragraph 13A);”.

(7)After paragraph 13 insert—

Power under paragraphs 10 and 11 to commit to prison: further provision
13A(1)In the case of a person under the age of 21—

(a)an order under paragraph 10(5)(ba) or 11(2)(ba) must be for committal to a young offender institution instead of to prison, but

(b)the Secretary of State may from time to time direct that a person committed to a young offender institution by such an order is to be detained in a prison or remand centre instead.

(2)A person committed to prison or a young offender institution by an order under paragraph 10(5)(ba) or 11(2)(ba) is to be regarded as being in legal custody.

(3)No more than three orders under paragraph 10(5)(ba) or 11(2)(ba) may be made in relation to the same community order.”

(8)In paragraph 14 (revocation etc of community order subject to magistrates’ court supervision), in sub-paragraph (2)—

(a)in paragraph (a), omit the final “and”;

(b)after paragraph (a) insert—

“(aa)if the community order qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of section 217A, the court that made the order, and”.

Commencement Information

I12	Sch. 14 para. 12 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

Breach of suspended sentence order: power to commit to custody
13(1)Schedule 16 (breach etc of suspended sentence order) is amended as follows.

(2)In paragraph 4—

(a)in sub-paragraph (1)(a), after “293(1)” insert “or 293A(1)”;

(b)in sub-paragraph (2)(a), after “293(4)” insert “or 293A(3)”.

(3)After paragraph 9 insert—

Issue of summons or warrant after review hearing in special procedure cases
9A(1)This paragraph applies where—

(a)a suspended sentence order is subject to review in accordance with section 293A(1),

(b)on a review hearing under section 294(5) a magistrates’ court or the Crown Court (“the court”) is of the opinion that the offender has without reasonable excuse breached a community requirement of the order, and

(c)the court does not deal with the case forthwith under section 294(5).

(2)The court may at any time—

(a)issue a summons requiring the offender to appear at the place and time specified in it, or

(b)issue a warrant for the offender’s arrest.

(3)A summons or warrant issued under this paragraph must direct the offender to appear or be brought before the court which issued it.

(4)Where—

(a)a summons is issued under this paragraph, and

(b)the offender does not appear in answer to the summons,

the court may issue a warrant for the arrest of the offender.”
(4)In paragraph 10, in sub-paragraph (1)(a)(i), after “8” insert “or 9A”.

(5)In paragraph 12, in sub-paragraph (2)(a)(i), after “9” insert “or 9A”.

(6)In paragraph 13, in sub-paragraph (1), after paragraph (d) insert—

“(da)in a case where the suspended sentence order qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of this paragraph, the court is dealing with the case by virtue of paragraph 10 or 12(2) and the offender is aged 18 or over, the court may order the offender to be committed to prison for such period not exceeding 28 days as the court considers appropriate (but see also paragraph 13A);”.

(7)In paragraph 14 (duty to make activation order where not unjust), in sub-paragraph (2)—

(a)in paragraph (a), omit the final “and”;

(b)after paragraph (b) insert “, and

(c)in a case where the suspended sentence order qualifies for special procedures for the purposes of paragraph 13(1)(da), the court is dealing with the case by virtue of paragraph 10 or 12(2) and the offender is aged 18 or over, the possibility of making an order under paragraph 13(1)(da).”

(8)After paragraph 16 insert—

Power under paragraph 13(1)(da) to commit to prison: further provision
16A(1)In the case of an offender under the age of 21—

(a)an order under paragraph 13(1)(da) must be for committal to a young offender institution instead of to prison, but

(b)the Secretary of State may from time to time direct that a person committed to a young offender institution by such an order is to be detained in a prison or remand centre instead.

(2)A person committed to prison or a young offender institution by an order under paragraph 13(1)(da) is to be regarded as being in legal custody.

(3)No more than three orders under paragraph 13(1)(da) may be made in relation to the same suspended sentence order.”

Commencement Information

I13	Sch. 14 para. 13 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)

PART 2
Prospective amendments
Prospective amendments relating to abolition of detention in a young offender institution
14(1)Schedule 22 of the Sentencing Act 2020 (prospective amendments) is amended as follows.

(2)In paragraph 21 (powers to imprison for breach of community order)—

(a)in sub-paragraph (2)(a), in the inserted paragraph (d), after sub-paragraph (i) insert—

“(ia)the order does not qualify for special procedures for the purposes of paragraph (ba);”;

(b)in sub-paragraph (3)(a), in the inserted paragraph (d), before sub-paragraph (i) insert—

“(ai)the community order does not qualify for special procedures for the purposes of paragraph (ba),”.

(3)After paragraph 75 insert—

“75AIn paragraph 13A of Schedule 10 (detention following breach of community order)—

(a)omit sub-paragraph (1);

(b)in sub-paragraph (2), omit “or a young offender institution”.”

(4)After paragraph 78 insert—

“78AIn paragraph 16A of Schedule 16 (detention following breach of suspended sentence order)—

(a)omit sub-paragraph (1);

(b)in sub-paragraph (2), omit “or a young offender institution”.”

Commencement Information

I14	Sch. 14 para. 14 in force at 28.6.2022, see s. 208(5)(r)


Annex A – Glossary
AFA 2006	The Armed Forces Act 2006
BSL	British Sign Language
CAT	Competition Appeal Tribunal
CFA	Criminal Finances Act 2017
CJA 2003	Criminal Justice Act 2003
COFPN	Conditional Offer of Fixed Penalty Notice
COPO Act	The Crime (Overseas Production Orders) Act 2019
CSPs	Community Safety Partnerships
DHMP	Detention at Her Majesty’s Pleasure
DVLA	Driver and Vehicle Licensing Agency
DVSA	Driver and Vehicle Standards Agency
DYOI	Detention in a Young Offenders Institution
DPN	Digital Processing Notice
DTO	Detention and Training
EAT	Employment Appeal Tribunal
EMI	Electronic Money Institutions
ERS	Early Removal Scheme
ET	Employment Tribunal
FCA	Financial Conduct Authority
FPNs	Fixed Penalty Notices
HMRC	Her Majesty's Revenue and Customs
IICSA	The Independent Inquiry into Child Sexual Abuse
IPP	Imprisonment for Public Protection
LASPO	Legal Aid, Sentencing and Punishment of Offenders Act 2012
MAPPA	Multi-Agency Public Protection Arrangements
MLA	Mutual Legal Assistance
NCA	National Crime Agency
NDA	Road Traffic (New Drivers) Act 1995
PACE	Police and Criminal Evidence Act 1984
PCC(S)A	Powers of Criminal Courts (Sentencing) Act 2000
PI	Payment Institution
Police Federation	Police Federation of England and Wales
PRSA	Police Reform and Social Responsibility Act 2011
ROA	Rehabilitation of Offenders Act 1974
ROPARPS	Release of Prisoners (Alteration of Relevant Proportion of Sentence) Order 2020
RTOA 1988	Road Traffic Offenders Act 1988
RUI	Released under investigation
SCHs	Secure Children’s Homes
SDS	Standard Determinate Sentence
SFO	Serious Fraud Office
SHPO	Sexual Harm Prevention Order
SOPC	Sentence for Offenders of Particular Concern
SRO	Sexual Risk Order
SVRO	Serious Violence Reduction Order
The 1971 Act	Criminal Damage Act 1971
The 1980 Act	Magistrates’ Court Act 1980
The 1984 Act	Repatriation of Prisoners Act 1984
The 1986 Act	Public Order Act 1986
The 1988 Act	Road Traffic Act 1988
The 1991 Act	Criminal Justice Act 1991
The 1993 Act	Prisoners and Criminal Proceedings (Scotland) Act 1993
The 1994 Act	Criminal Justice and Public Order Act 1994
The 1995 Act	Criminal Procedure (Scotland) Act 1995
The 1996 Act	Police Act 1996
The 1997 Act	Crime (Sentences) Act 1997
The 1998 Act	Crime and Disorder Act 1998
The 2000 Act	Terrorism Act 2000
The 2003 Act	Sexual Offences Act 2003
The 2007 Act	Custodial Sentences and Weapons (Scotland) Act 2007
The 2008 Act	Criminal Justice and Immigration Act 2008
The 2011 Act	Charities Act 2011
The 2015 Act	The Criminal Justice and Courts Act 2015
The 2020 Act	Sentencing Act 2020
The Code	The Sentencing Code
TORER	Terrorist Offenders (Restriction of Early Release) Act 2020
VRH	Video Remand Hearing
YCS	Youth Custody Service
YRO	Youth Rehabilitation Order
